Maine, session 132, LD1872.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA c. 421, sub-c. 4, art. 10 is enacted to read:
ARTICLE 10
RETIREMENT IMPROVEMENT FUND
§17445. Retirement Improvement Fund
1. Establishment of fund. The Retirement Improvement Fund, referred to in this
section as "the fund," is established within and administered by the retirement system as an
interest-bearing, nonlapsing fund for the payment of retirement benefit improvements.
2. Content of fund. The fund consists of all money transferred to the fund under this
section and other money made available to the fund. For fiscal years 2028-29, 2029-30,
2030-31 and 2031-32, within 30 days of the beginning of each fiscal year, the State
Controller shall transfer to the fund from the General Fund an amount calculated under
subsection 3.
3. Calculation of transfer amount. The amount required to be transferred to the fund
under subsection 2 is equal to the difference between the amount of the payments made
toward the obligation for the unfunded actuarial liability in the year in which the amount is
transferred and the amount of those payments for fiscal year 2027-28.
4. Use of fund. Money in the fund must be used to pay for retirement benefit
improvements. Whenever the fund has sufficient capital to pay for an increase in the
amount of at least $1,000 on the benefit base on which the annual cost-of-living adjustment
is applied pursuant to section 17806, subsection 1, paragraph A, for all beneficiaries in the
retirement system, that increase must be applied but only until the benefit base reaches
$40,000.
5. Reporting. By March 1st of 2029, 2030, 2031 and 2032, the retirement system
shall make a report regarding implementation of this section to the joint standing committee
of the Legislature having jurisdiction over retirement matters that includes the following
information for that fiscal year and the prior 3 fiscal years:
A. The amount of money transferred to the fund pursuant to subsection 2;
B. The total increases made to the benefit base on which the annual cost-of-living
adjustment must be applied in accordance with subsection 4;
C. The amount of payment made or required to be made toward the obligation for the
unfunded actuarial liability; and
D. The balance in the fund.